Utah statutes.
48-2c-1704.   Stay of proceedings.
Whether or not a demand for action was made, if the company promptly commences
an investigation of the allegations made in the demand or complaint, the court
may stay the action for such reasonable period as the court considers
appropriate but, in any event, the stay shall expire at the earlier of 30 days
or when the company's investigation is completed.
